Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.525

Sanitary certificates—Rules—Fee for issuance.

The department may issue sanitary certificates to milk processing plants under this chapter subject to such requirements as it may establish by rule. The fee for issuance is seventy-five dollars per certificate beginning July 1, 2015. Fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the agricultural local fund.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 27 s 5; 1999 c 291 s 25.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 27: See note following RCW 15.36.051.